Illinois, session 104th, HB1564.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by adding Section 64.5 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1705/4.5 new)8    Sec. 4.5. TABE and physical agility testing for mental 9health technicians. The Department shall require every 10applicant seeking employment as a mental health technician 11trainee at a State-operated developmental center to: (i) 12complete the Test for Adult Basic Education and obtain a score 13that demonstrates the applicant's ability to read and write at 14a 5th grade level; and (ii) complete a series of basic physical 15agility tests, including a test that demonstrates the 16applicant's ability to lift at least 50 pounds, a one-mile 17walk test, a shuttle run, and a patient transfer test. Such 18testing shall be in addition to any other testing or 19application requirements for employment as a mental health 20technician trainee at a State-operated developmental center. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.